Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2468.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5943HV (1) 91 ak/ko H.F. 2468 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 135.107A Iowa rural health 1 transformation fund. 2 1. An Iowa rural health transformation fund is created 3 in the state treasury under the control of the department of 4 health and human services. The fund shall be separate from 5 the general fund of the state and the balance in the fund 6 shall not be considered part of the balance of the general 7 fund of the state. The fund shall consist of moneys received 8 by the state from the rural health transformation program 9 established pursuant to the One Big Beautiful Bill Act, Pub. 10 L. No. 119-211. Moneys in the fund are to be appropriated to 11 the department to be used, expended, granted, or transferred as 12 authorized by the centers for Medicare and Medicaid services 13 of the United States department of health and human services, 14 and are not subject to section 8.33. Notwithstanding section 15 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund 16 shall be credited to the fund. 17 2. For so long as moneys are expended from the fund, the 18 department shall submit a report each fiscal quarter to the 19 general assembly detailing all expenditures made during the 20 preceding fiscal quarter, including identifying by city where 21 within the state moneys have been expended. 22 3. The department shall transmit a copy to the general 23 assembly of all rural health transformation program financial 24 and performance reports submitted to the centers for Medicare 25 and Medicaid services of the United States department of health 26 and human services pursuant to the One Big Beautiful Bill Act, 27 Pub. L. No. 119-211. 28 4. This section is repealed October 1, 2032. 29